Maine, session 132, LD141.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §4612, sub-§1, ¶C is enacted to read:
C. The commission shall contract with impartial mediators for the 3rd-party neutral
mediation program under paragraph A. For the purposes of this section, while carrying
out their official duties, mediators are considered state employees and are entitled to
the immunity provided to state employees under the Maine Tort Claims Act.
Page 1 - 132LR0451(03)